Washington statutes.
RCW 19.390.060

Premerger notification—Copy to attorney general—Hart-Scott-Rodino act.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5122.SL) ***

Any provider or provider organization conducting business in this state that files a premerger notification with the federal trade commission or the United States department of justice, in compliance with the Hart-Scott-Rodino antitrust improvements act, Title 15 U.S.C. Sec. 18a, shall provide a copy of such filing to the attorney general. Providing a copy of the Hart-Scott-Rodino filing to the attorney general satisfies the notice requirement under RCW 19.390.040.

[2019 c 267 s 6.]